District of Columbia statutes.
9-204.06

Extent of name to be used; use on street signs.

The Council shall use the person’s given name as well as the person’s surname in naming a public space in the District of Columbia in honor of a person. If the full name exceeds 21 characters a meaningful part of the name may be used on the street signs.

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-201, § 406, 30 DCR 148
1981 Ed., § 7-456.